North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§ 122C-124.2.
Actions by the Secretary to ensure effective management of behavioral health services under the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver.

For all local management entity/managed care organizations, the Secretary shall certify whether the LME/MCO is in compliance or is not in compliance with all requirements of subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection (b) of this section. The Secretary’s certification shall be made every six months beginning August 1, 2013. In order to ensure accurate evaluation of administrative, operational, actuarial and financial components, and overall performance of the LME/MCO, the Secretary’s certification shall be based upon an internal and external assessment made by an independent external review agency in accordance with applicable federal and State laws and regulations. Beginning on February 1, 2014, and for all subsequent assessments for certification, the independent review will be made by an External Quality Review Organization approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in accordance with applicable federal and State laws and regulations.

The Secretary’s certification under subsection (a) of this section shall be in writing and signed by the Secretary and shall contain a clear and unequivocal statement that the Secretary has determined the local management entity/managed care organization to be in compliance with all of the following requirements:

The LME/MCO has made adequate provision against the risk of insolvency and either (i) is not required to be under a corrective action plan in accordance with

G.S. 122C-125.2

or (ii) is in compliance with a corrective action plan required under

G.S. 122C-125.2

.

The LME/MCO is making timely provider payments. The Secretary shall certify that an LME/MCO is making timely provider payments if there are no consecutive three-month periods during which the LME/MCO paid less than ninety percent (90%) of clean claims for covered services within the 30-day period following the LME/MCO’s receipt of these claims during that three-month period. As used in this subdivision, a “clean claim” is a claim that can be processed without obtaining additional information from the provider of the service or from a third party. The term includes a claim with errors originating in the LME/MCO’s claims system. The term does not include a claim from a provider who is under investigation by a governmental agency for fraud or abuse or a claim under review for medical necessity.

The LME/MCO is exchanging billing, payment, and transaction information with the Department and providers in a manner that complies with all applicable federal standards, including all of the following:

Standards for information transactions and data elements specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1302d-2 of the Healthcare Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), as from time to time amended.

Standards for health care claims or equivalent encounter information transactions specified in HIPAA regulations in 45 C.F.R. § 162.1102, as from time to time amended.

Implementation specifications for Electronic Data Interchange standards published and maintained by the Accredited Standards Committee (ASC X12) and referenced in HIPAA regulations in 45 C.F.R. § 162.920, as from time to time amended.

If the Secretary does not provide a local management entity/managed care organization with the certification of compliance required by this section based upon the LME/MCO’s failure to comply with any of the requirements specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall do the following:

Prepare a written notice informing the LME/MCO of the provisions of subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (b) of this section with which the LME/MCO is deemed not to be in compliance and the reasons for the determination of noncompliance.

Cause the notice of the noncompliance to be delivered to the LME/MCO.

Not later than 10 days after the Secretary’s notice of noncompliance is provided to the LME/MCO, assign the Contract of the noncompliant LME/MCO to a compliant LME/MCO.

Oversee the transfer of the operations and contracts from the noncompliant LME/MCO to the compliant LME/MCO in accordance with the provisions in subsection (e) of this section.

If, at any time, in the Secretary’s determination, a local management entity/managed care organization is not in compliance with a requirement of the Contract other than those specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection (b) of this section, then the Secretary shall do all of the following:

Prepare a written notice informing the LME/MCO of the provisions of the Contract with which the LME/MCO is deemed not to be in compliance and the reasons therefor.

Cause the notice of the noncompliance to be delivered to the LME/MCO.

Allow the noncompliant LME/MCO 30 calendar days from the date of receipt of the notice to respond to the notice of noncompliance and to demonstrate compliance to the satisfaction of the Secretary.

Upon the expiration of the period allowed under subdivision (3) of this subsection, make a final determination on the issue of compliance and promptly notify the LME/MCO of the determination.

Upon a final determination that an LME/MCO is noncompliant, allow no more than 30 days following the date of notification of the final determination of noncompliance for the noncompliant LME/MCO to complete negotiations for a merger or realignment with a compliant LME/MCO that is satisfactory to the Secretary.

If the noncompliant LME/MCO does not successfully complete negotiations with a compliant LME/MCO as described in subdivision (5) of this subsection, assign the Contract of the noncompliant LME/MCO to a compliant LME/MCO.

Oversee the transfer of the operations and contracts from the noncompliant LME/MCO to the compliant LME/MCO in accordance with the provisions in subsection (e) of this section.

If the Secretary assigns the Contract of a noncompliant local management entity/managed care organization to a compliant LME/MCO under subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section, or under subdivision (6) of subsection (d) of this section, the Secretary shall oversee the orderly transfer of all management responsibilities, operations, and contracts of the noncompliant LME/MCO to the compliant LME/MCO. The noncompliant LME/MCO shall cooperate with the Secretary in order to ensure the uninterrupted provision of services to Medicaid recipients. In making this transfer, the Secretary shall do all of the following:

Arrange for the providers of services to be reimbursed from the remaining fund balance or risk reserve of the noncompliant LME/MCO, or from other funds of the Department if necessary, for proper, authorized, and valid claims for services rendered that were not previously paid by the noncompliant LME/MCO.

Effectuate an orderly transfer of management responsibilities from the noncompliant LME/MCO to the compliant LME/MCO, including the responsibility of paying providers for covered services that are subsequently rendered.

Oversee the dissolution of the noncompliant LME/MCO, including transferring to the compliant LME/MCO all assets of the noncompliant LME/MCO, including any balance remaining in its risk reserve after payments have been made under subdivision (1) of this subsection. Risk reserve funds of the noncompliant LME/MCO may be used only to pay authorized and approved provider claims. Any funds remaining in the risk reserve transferred under this subdivision shall become part of the compliant LME/MCO’s risk reserve and subject to the same restrictions on the use of the risk reserve applicable to the compliant LME/MCO. If the risk reserves transferred from the noncompliant LME/MCO are insufficient, the Secretary shall guarantee any needed risk reserves for the compliant LME/MCO arising from the additional risks being assumed by the compliant LME/MCO until the compliant LME/MCO has established fifteen percent (15%) risk reserves. All other assets shall be used to satisfy the liabilities of the noncompliant LME/MCO. In the event there are insufficient assets to satisfy the liabilities of the noncompliant LME/MCO, it shall be the responsibility of the Secretary to satisfy the liabilities of the noncompliant LME/MCO.

Following completion of the actions specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection, direct the dissolution of the noncompliant LME/MCO and deliver a notice of dissolution to the board of county commissioners of each of the counties in the dissolved LME/MCO. An LME/MCO that is dissolved by the Secretary in accordance with the provisions of this section may be dissolved at any time during the fiscal year.

The Secretary shall provide a copy of each written, signed certification of compliance or noncompliance completed in accordance with this section to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

Compliant local management entity/managed care organization. — An LME/MCO that has undergone an independent external assessment and been determined by the Secretary to be operating successfully and to have the capability of expanding.

Contract. — The contract between the Department of Health and Human Services and a local management entity for the operation of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver.

History.

2013-85, s. 2; 2018-5, s. 11F.10(d).

§ 122C-125.
Area Authority financial failure; State assumption of financial control.

At any time that the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services determines that an area authority is in imminent danger of failing financially and of failing to provide direct services to clients, the Secretary, after providing written notification of the Secretary’s intent to the area board and after providing the area authority an opportunity to be heard, may assume control of the financial affairs of the area authority and appoint an administrator to exercise the powers assumed. This assumption of control shall have the effect of divesting the area authority of its powers as to the adoption of budgets, expenditures of money, and all other financial powers conferred in the area authority by law. County funding of the area authority shall continue when the State has assumed control of the financial affairs of the area authority. At no time after the State has assumed this control shall a county withdraw funds previously obligated or appropriated to the area authority. The Secretary shall adopt rules to define imminent danger of failing financially and of failing to provide direct services to clients.

Upon assumption of financial control, the Department shall, in conjunction with the area authority, develop and implement a corrective plan of action and provide notification to the area authority’s board of directors of the plan. The Department shall also keep the county board of commissioners and the area authority’s board of directors informed of any ongoing concerns or problems with the area authority’s finances.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 23.2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 749, s. 7; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 122C-125.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.13(a), effective July 1, 2002.

§ 122C-125.2.
LME/MCO solvency ranges; formula; corrective action plan.

Beginning on September 1, 2018, the Department shall calculate on a quarterly basis a solvency range for each LME/MCO as a sum of the following figures to produce upper and lower range values:

Incurred but not reported claims figure. — The incurred but not reported claims figure shall be calculated by multiplying an LME/MCO’s service spending for the preceding 12 months by six and eight-tenths percent (6.8%). If an LME/MCO experiences extenuating circumstances supported by actuarial documentation, then the Department may utilize a percentage other than six and eight-tenths (6.8%) for that LME/MCO.

Net operating liabilities figure. — The net operating liabilities figure shall be calculated by subtracting noncash current accounts receivable from the nonclaims current liabilities, as reported on the LME/MCO’s most recent balance sheet. If the noncash accounts receivable are greater than the nonclaim liabilities, then the value for the net operating liabilities figure is zero.

Catastrophic or extraordinary events range. — The catastrophic or extraordinary events range shall be calculated as the range between a lower figure and an upper figure. The lower figure shall be calculated by multiplying an LME/MCO’s service expenditures from the preceding 12 months by four and fifteen-hundredths percent (4.15%). The upper figure shall be calculated by multiplying an LME/MCO’s service expenditures from the preceding 12 months by eight and three-tenths percent (8.3%).

Required intergovernmental transfers figure. — The required intergovernmental transfers figure is the amount of funds needed by an LME/MCO to make any intergovernmental transfers required by law over the subsequent 24 months.

Projected operating loss figure. — The projected operating loss figure is the projected net loss for an LME/MCO over the subsequent 24 months. In projecting the net loss for an LME/MCO, the Department shall use the net loss of the LME/MCO in the preceding 12 months adjusted for any changes in single-stream funding, intergovernmental transfers, or other factors known to the Department that will impact the LME/MCO’s net loss over the subsequent 24 months. If a net profit is projected for an LME/MCO, then this figure is zero.

Reinvestment plan figure. — The reinvestment plan figure is the amount required for all qualifying expenditures contained in an LME/MCO’s reinvestment plans over the subsequent 36 months. To qualify as an expenditure under this subdivision, the expenditure must be related to one of the following:

An initiative that supports specific goals or health status outcomes of the State in relation to the State’s behavioral health needs.

An initiative that meets a State behavioral health need, as defined in law or by the Department.

Funding for infrastructure that supports the effective and efficient operation of the LME/MCO.

Funding for a facility within the LME/MCO catchment area that is necessary to meet to the needs of the population served by the LME/MCO.

New or expanded initiatives and programmatic improvements to the State behavioral health system.

Working capital to be utilized to fund changes in rates, operations, or programs.

Assistance to public school units within the LME/MCO catchment area for student behavioral health needs.

Upon calculation of the solvency range for each LME/MCO required by subsection (a) of this section, the Department shall compare the cash balance of each LME/MCO to its solvency range. For purposes of this subsection, the cash balance shall consist of the total of the LME/MCO’s cash and investment balances, including its Medicaid Risk Reserve, as reported on the LME/MCO’s most recent balance sheet.Upon comparison of an LME/MCO’s cash balance to its solvency range, the Department shall take one of the following actions:

If an LME/MCO’s cash balance is five percent (5%) or more below the lower solvency range figure or five percent (5%) or more above the upper solvency range figure, then the Department shall notify the LME/MCO and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly of the comparison results. Within 30 days from providing notice to the LME/MCO, the Department shall develop, in collaboration with the LME/MCO, a corrective action plan for the LME/MCO. The corrective action plan must include specific actions, which may include changes to the LME/MCO’s reinvestment plan, utilization management, and capitation or provider rates, to bring the LME/MCO’s cash balance within the solvency range, as well as a time line for implementation of these actions.

If an LME/MCO’s cash balance is neither five percent (5%) or more below the lower solvency range figure nor five percent (5%) or more above the upper solvency range figure, then the Department shall notify the LME/MCO and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly of the LME/MCO’s solvency range for the quarter and the Department’s comparison of the LME/MCO’s cash balance to this solvency range. No further action shall be required.

Beginning on October 15, 2018, the Department shall submit a quarterly report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division detailing the solvency ranges and comparisons required under subsection (b) of this section for each LME/MCO. The Department shall include in its report a copy of any new corrective action plans developed as a result of those comparisons, as well as any status updates on previously reported corrective action plans.

For any calculation required by this section that is based upon the preceding 12 months, the Department is authorized to make adjustments to that calculation that take into account any changes in an LME/MCO’s catchment area that occurred during that 12-month period.

History.

2018-5, s. 11F.10(b); 2020-49, s. 5.

§§ 122C-125.3 through 122C-125.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 122C-125.6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.13(a), effective July 1, 2002.

§ 122C-126.1.
Confidentiality of competitive health care information.

For the purposes of this section, competitive health care information means information relating to competitive health care activities by or on behalf of the area authority. Competitive health care information shall be confidential and not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes; provided that any contract entered into by or on behalf of an area authority shall be a public record, unless otherwise exempted by law, or the contract contains competitive health care information, the determination of which shall be as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

If an area authority is requested to disclose any contract that the area authority believes in good faith contains or constitutes competitive health care information, the area authority may either redact the portions of the contract believed to constitute competitive health care information prior to disclosure or, if the entire contract constitutes competitive health care information, refuse disclosure of the contract. The person requesting disclosure of the contract may institute an action pursuant to

G.S. 132-9

to compel disclosure of the contract or any redacted portion thereof. In any action brought under this subsection, the issue for decision by the court shall be whether the contract, or portions of the contract withheld, constitutes competitive health care information, and in making its determination, the court shall be guided by the procedures and standards applicable to protective orders requested under Rule 26(c)(7) of the Rules of Civil Procedure. Before rendering a decision, the court shall review the contract in camera and hear arguments from the parties. If the court finds that the contract constitutes or contains competitive health care information, the court may either deny disclosure or may make such other appropriate orders as are permitted under Rule 26(c) of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the Attorney General, the State Auditor, or an elected public body, in closed session, which has responsibility for the area authority, from having access to this confidential information. The disclosure to any public entity does not affect the confidentiality of the information. Members of the public entity shall have a duty not to further disclose the confidential information.

History.

2012-151, s. 10.

Part 2A. Consolidated Human Services.

§ 122C-127.
Consolidated human services board; human services director.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and subject to any limitations that may be imposed by the board of county commissioners under

G.S. 153A-77

, a consolidated human services agency shall have the responsibility and authority set forth in G.S. 122C-117(a) to carry out the programs established in this Chapter in conformity with the rules and regulations of the Department and under the supervision of the Secretary in the same manner as an area authority. In addition to the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-77(d)

, a consolidated human services board shall have all the powers and duties of the governing unit of an area authority as provided by G.S. 122C-117(b), except that the consolidated human services board may not:

Appoint the human services director.

Transmit or present the budget for social services programs.

Enter into contracts, including contracts to provide services to governmental or private entities, unless specifically authorized to do so by the board of county commissioners in accordance with county contracting policies and procedures.

In addition to the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-77(e)

, a human services director shall have all the powers and duties of an area director as provided by

G.S. 122C-121

, except that the human services director may:

Serve as the executive officer of the consolidated human services board only to the extent and in the manner authorized by the county manager.

Appoint staff of the consolidated human services agency only upon the approval of the county manager.The human services director is not an employee of the area board, but serves as an employee of the county under the direct supervision of the county manager.

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 12.

§§ 122C-128 through 122C-130.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Service Delivery System.

§ 122C-131.
Composition of system.

Mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services of the public system in this State shall be delivered through area authorities and State facilities.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 15.

§§ 122C-132,
122C-132.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.14, effective July 1, 2002.

§§ 122C-133 through 122C-140.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Area Facilities.

§ 122C-141.
Provision of services.

The area authority or county program shall contract with other qualified public or private providers, agencies, institutions, or resources for the provision of services, and, subject to the approval of the Secretary, is authorized to provide services directly. The area authority or county program shall indicate in its local business plan how services will be provided and how the provision of services will address issues of access, availability of qualified public or private providers, consumer choice, and fair competition. The Secretary shall take into account these issues when reviewing the local business plan and considering approval of the direct provision of services. Unless an area authority or county program requests a shorter time, any approval granted by the Secretary shall be for not less than one year. The Secretary shall develop criteria for the approval of direct service provision by area authorities and county programs in accordance with this section and as evidenced by compliance with the local business plan. For the purposes of this section, a qualified public or private provider is a provider that meets the provider qualifications as defined by rules adopted by the Secretary.

All area authority or county program services provided directly or under contract shall meet the requirements of applicable State statutes and the rules of the Commission and the Secretary. The Secretary may delay payments and, with written notification of cause, may reduce or deny payment of funds if an area authority or county program fails to meet these requirements.

The area authority or board of county commissioners of a county program may contract with a health maintenance organization, certified and operating in accordance with the provisions of Article 67 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes for the area authority or county program, to provide mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse services to enrollees in a health care plan provided by the health maintenance organization. The terms of the contract must meet the requirements of all applicable State statutes and rules of the Commission and Secretary governing both the provision of services by an area authority or county program and the general and fiscal operation of an area authority or county program and the reimbursement rate for services rendered shall be based on the usual and customary charges paid by the health maintenance organization to similar providers. Any provision in conflict with a State statute or rule of the Commission or the Secretary shall be void; however, the presence of any void provision in that contract does not render void any other provision in that contract which is not in conflict with a State statute or rule of the Commission or the Secretary. Subject to approval by the Secretary and pending the timely reimbursement of the contractual charges, the area authority or county program may expend funds for costs which may be incurred by the area authority or county program as a result of providing the additional services under a contractual agreement with a health maintenance organization.

If two or more counties enter into an interlocal agreement under Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes to be a public provider of mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse services (“public provider”), before an LME may enter into a contract with the public provider, all of the following must apply:

The public provider must meet all the provider qualifications as defined by rules adopted by the Commission. A county that satisfies its duties under G.S. 122C-115(a) through a consolidated human services agency may not be considered a qualified provider for purposes of this subdivision.

The LME must adopt a conflict of interest policy that applies to all provider contracts.

The interlocal agreement must provide that any liabilities of the public provider shall be paid from its unobligated surplus funds and that if those funds are not sufficient to satisfy the indebtedness, the remaining indebtedness shall be apportioned to the participating counties.

When enforcing rules adopted by the Commission, the Secretary shall ensure that there is fair competition among providers.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, ss. 7, 18; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; c. 539, ss. 3, 4; c. 614, s. 7; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 839; 1989, c. 625, s. 16; 2001-437, s. 1.15; 2006-142, s. 4(l); 2007-504, s. 2.4(a).

§ 122C-142.
Contract for services.

When the area authority contracts with persons for the provision of services, it shall use the standard contract adopted by the Secretary and shall assure that these contracted services meet the requirements of applicable State statutes and the rules of the Commission and the Secretary. However, an area authority may amend the contract to comply with any court-imposed duty or responsibility. An area authority that is operating under a Medicaid waiver may amend the contract subject to the approval of the Secretary. Terms of the standard contract shall require the area authority to monitor the contract to assure that rules and State statutes are met. It shall also place an obligation upon the entity providing services to provide to the area authority timely data regarding the clients being served, the services provided, and the client outcomes. The Secretary may also monitor contracted services to assure that rules and State statutes are met.

When the area authority contracts for services, it may provide funds to purchase liability insurance, to provide legal representation, and to pay any claim with respect to liability for acts, omissions, or decisions by members of the boards or employees of the persons with whom the area authority contracts. These acts, omissions, and decisions shall be ones that arise out of the performance of the contract and may not result from actual fraud, corruption, or actual malice on the part of the board members or employees.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, s. 18; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; c. 539, ss. 3, 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2006-142, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 23; 2013-85, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-142, s. 1, effective July 19, 2006, in subsection (a) in the first sentence, deleted “the area authority” following “the provision of services,” and inserted “it shall use the standard contract adopted by the Secretary and,” inserted the second sentence, in the fourth sentence, inserted “standard” preceding “contract,” and inserted the fifth sentence.

Session Laws 2006-259, s. 23, effective August 23, 2006, inserted the third sentence in subsection (a).

§ 122C-142.1.
Substance abuse services for those convicted of driving while impaired or driving while less than 21 years old after consuming alcohol or drugs.

Services. — An area authority shall provide, directly or by contract, the substance abuse services needed by a person to obtain a certificate of completion required under

G.S. 20-17.6

as a condition for the restoration of a drivers license. A person may obtain the required services from an area facility, from a private facility authorized by the Department to provide this service, or, with the approval of the Department, from an agency that is located in another state.

(a1)

Authorization of a Private Facility Provider. —

The Department shall authorize a private facility located in this State to provide substance abuse services needed by a person to obtain a certificate of completion if the private facility complies with all of the requirements of this subsection:

Notifies both the designated area facility for the catchment area in which it is located and the Department of its intent to provide the services.

Agrees to comply with the laws and rules concerning these services that apply to area facilities.

Pays the Department the applicable fee for authorizing and monitoring the services of the facility. The initial fee is payable at the time the facility notifies the Department of its intent to provide the services and by July 1 of each year thereafter. Collected fees shall be used by the Division for program monitoring and quality assurance. The applicable fee is based upon the number of assessments completed during the prior fiscal year as set forth below:

Number of Assessments
Fee Amount

0-24
$250.00

25-99
$500.00

100 or more
$750.00.

Assessments.— To conduct a substance abuse assessment, a facility shall give a client a standardized test approved by the Department to determine chemical dependency and shall conduct a clinical interview with the client. Based on the assessment, the facility shall recommend that the client either attend an alcohol and drug education traffic (ADET) school or obtain treatment. A recommendation shall be reviewed and signed by a certified alcoholism, drug abuse, or substance abuse counselor, as defined by the Commission, a Certified Substance Abuse Counselor, or by a physician certified by the American Society of Addiction Medicine (ASAM). The signature on the recommendation shall be the personal signature of the individual authorized to review the recommendation and not the signature of his or her agent. The signature shall reflect that the authorized individual has personally reviewed the recommendation and, with full knowledge of the contents of the recommendation, approved of the recommended treatment.

(b1)

Persons Authorized to Conduct Assessments. —

The following individuals are authorized to conduct a substance abuse assessment under subsection (b) of this section:

A Certified Substance Abuse Counselor (CSAC), as defined by the Commission.

A Licensed Clinical Addiction Specialist (LCAS), as defined by the Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-197, s. 2, effective October 1, 2008, and applicable to substance abuse assessments conducted on or after that date.

A person licensed by the North Carolina Medical Board or the North Carolina Psychology Board.

A physician certified by the American Society of Addiction Medicine (ASAM).

School or Treatment. — Attendance at an ADET school is required if none of the following applies and completion of a treatment program is required if any of the following applies:

The person took a chemical test at the time of the offense that caused the person’s license to be revoked and the test revealed that the person had an alcohol concentration at any relevant time after driving of at least 0.15.

The person has a prior conviction of an offense involving impaired driving.

The substance abuse assessment identifies a substance abuse disability.

Standards. — An ADET school shall offer the curriculum established by the Commission and shall comply with the rules adopted by the Commission. A substance abuse treatment program offered to a person who needs the program to obtain a certificate of completion shall comply with the rules adopted by the Commission.

(d1)

Persons Authorized to Provide Instruction. —

Beginning January 1, 2009, individuals who provide ADET school instruction as a Department-authorized ADETS instructor must have at least one of the following qualifications:

A Certified Substance Abuse Counselor (CSAC), as defined by the Commission.

A Licensed Clinical Addictions Specialist (LCAS), as defined by the Commission.

A Certified Substance Abuse Prevention Consultant (CSAPC), as defined by the Commission.

Certificate of Completion. — Any facility that issues a certificate of completion shall forward the original certificate of completion to the Department. The Department shall review the certificate of completion for accuracy and completeness. If the Department finds the certificate of completion to be accurate and complete, the Department shall forward it to the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation. If the Department finds the certificate of completion is not accurate or complete, the Department shall return the certificate of completion to the area facility for appropriate action.

Fees. — A person who has a substance abuse assessment conducted for the purpose of obtaining a certificate of completion shall pay to the assessing agency a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). A person shall pay to a school a fee of one hundred sixty dollars ($160.00). A person shall pay to a treatment facility a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00). If the defendant is treated by an area mental health facility,

G.S. 122C-146

applies after receipt of the seventy-five dollar ($75.00) fee.A facility that provides to a person who is required to obtain a certificate of completion a substance abuse assessment, an ADET school, or a substance abuse treatment program may require the person to pay a fee required by this subsection before it issues a certificate of completion. As stated in

G.S. 122C-146

, however, an area facility may not deny a service to a person because the person is unable to pay.A facility shall remit to the Department ten percent (10%) of each fee paid to the facility under this subsection by a person who attends an ADET school conducted by the facility. The Department may use amounts remitted to it under this subsection only to support, evaluate, and administer ADET schools.

(f1)

Multiple Assessments. —

If a person has more than one offense for which a certificate of completion is required under

G.S. 20-17.6

, the person shall pay the assessment fee required under subsection (f) of this section for each certificate of completion required. However, the facility shall conduct only one substance abuse assessment and recommend only one ADET school or treatment program for all certificates of completion required at that time, and the person shall pay the fee required under subsection (f) of this section for only one school or treatment program.If any of the criteria in subdivisions (c)(1), (c)(2), or (c)(3) of this section are present in any of the offenses for which the person needs a certificate of completion, completion of a treatment program shall be required pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.The provisions of this subsection do not apply to subsequent assessments performed after a certificate of completion has already been issued for a previous assessment.

Out-of-State Services. — A person may obtain a substance abuse service needed to obtain a certificate of completion from a provider located in another state if the service offered by that provider is substantially similar to the service offered by a provider located in this State. A person who obtains a service from a provider located in another state is responsible for paying any fees imposed by the provider.

Rules. — The Commission may adopt rules to implement this section. In developing rules for determining when a person needs to be placed in a substance abuse treatment program, the Commission shall consider diagnostic criteria such as those contained in the most recent revision of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual or used by the American Society of Addiction Medicine (ASAM).

Report. — The Department shall submit an annual report on substance abuse assessments to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. The report is due by February 1. Each facility that provides services needed by a person to obtain a certificate of completion shall file an annual report with the Department by October 1 that contains the information the Department needs to compile the report the Department is required to submit under this section.The report submitted to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations shall include all of the following information and any other information requested by that Commission:

The number of persons required to obtain a certificate of completion during the previous fiscal year as a condition of restoring the person’s drivers license under

G.S. 20-17.6

.

The number of substance abuse assessments conducted during the previous fiscal year for the purpose of obtaining a certificate of completion.

Of the number of assessments reported under subdivision (2) of this subsection, the number recommending attendance at an ADET school, the number recommending treatment, and, for those recommending treatment, the level of treatment recommended.

Of the number of persons recommended for an ADET school or treatment under subdivision (3) of this subsection, the number who completed the school or treatment.

The number of substance abuse assessments conducted by each facility and, of these assessments, the number that recommended attendance at an ADET school and the number that recommended treatment.

The fees paid to a facility for providing services for persons to obtain a certificate of completion and the facility’s costs in providing those services.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12A.8(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

1995, c. 496, ss. 10, 13; 2001-370, s. 9; 2003-396, ss. 1, 3, 4; 2004-197, ss. 1, 2, 3; 2005-312, ss. 1, 2, 4; 2008-130, ss. 7, 8; 2013-360, s. 12A.8(a).